Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-804
Keeping a place of prostitution; penalty.

(1) Any person who has or exercises control over the use of any place which offers seclusion or shelter for the practice of prostitution and who knowingly grants or permits the use of such place for the purpose of prostitution commits the offense of keeping a place of prostitution.

(2) Keeping a place of prostitution is a Class IV felony, unless any person using such place for the practice of prostitution is under the age of eighteen years, in which case any person convicted of keeping a place of prostitution shall be guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 160;

Laws 2013, LB255, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 11.